Colorado, session 2026A, HB1030.
Be it enacted by the General Assembly of the State of Colorado:
SECTION 1. In Colorado Revised Statutes, add part 8 to article
48.5 of title 24 as follows:
PART 8
DATA CENTER DEVELOPMENT
-3- HB26-1030

AND INCENTIVES
24-48.5-801. Short title.
THE SHORT TITLE OF THIS PART 8 IS THE "COLORADO DATA CENTER
WORKFORCE, CLEAN ENERGY, GRID MODERNIZATION, AND CONSUMER
AND ENVIRONMENTAL PROTECTION ACT".
24-48.5-802. Legislative declaration.
(1) THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY FINDS, DETERMINES, AND DECLARES
THAT:
(a) DATA CENTERS ARE ESSENTIAL CRITICAL INFRASTRUCTURE
POWERING THE MODERN DIGITAL ECONOMY;
(b) DATA CENTERS WILL DRIVE COMMUNITY ACCESS TO SOLAR AND
BATTERY STORAGE;
(c) COLORADO FACES INTERRELATED CHALLENGES IN:
(I) ACHIEVING ITS CLEAN ENERGY AND GREENHOUSE GAS
REDUCTION GOALS WHILE MAINTAINING GRID RELIABILITY;
(II) MODERNIZING GRID INFRASTRUCTURE FOR ELECTRIFICATION
AND PROJECTED LOAD GROWTH;
(III) ENSURING EQUITABLE DEVELOPMENT ACROSS URBAN,
SUBURBAN, AND RURAL COMMUNITIES; AND
(IV) CREATING COMMUNITY BENEFITS THROUGH EXPANDING
SOLAR AND BATTERY STORAGE PROGRAMS, ENSURING ALL COLORADANS
HAVE ACCESS TO CLEAN ENERGY GENERATION AND STORAGE;
(d) THE COLORADO ELECTRIC TRANSMISSION AUTHORITY HAS
IDENTIFIED TRANSMISSION NEEDS REQUIRING AN INVESTMENT OF
APPROXIMATELY FOUR BILLION FIVE HUNDRED MILLION DOLLARS BY 2045
TO MODERNIZE, ENHANCE RELIABILITY, AND INTEGRATE CLEAN ENERGY;
AND
-4- HB26-1030

(e) DATA CENTERS REPRESENT A TRANSFORMATIVE OPPORTUNITY
TO:
(I) CREATE HIGH-WAGE EMPLOYMENT ACROSS SECTORS,
INCLUDING:
(A) TECHNOLOGY FOCUSED ROLES IN OPERATIONS,
CYBERSECURITY, NETWORK ENGINEERING, AND SYSTEMS
ADMINISTRATION;
(B) CONSTRUCTION AND SKILLED TRADES OPPORTUNITIES TO MEET
THE FAST-GROWING DEMAND FOR DATA CENTER BUILDS; AND
(C) ENERGY CAREERS IN GENERATION, TRANSMISSION,
RENEWABLE ENERGY, AND GRID PROJECTS;
(II) ACCELERATE GRID MODERNIZATION THROUGH:
(A) STRATEGIC PRIVATE INVESTMENT IN TRANSMISSION AND
DISTRIBUTION THAT BENEFITS ALL RATEPAYERS;
(B) THE DEVELOPMENT OF NEW GENERATION, BATTERY STORAGE,
AND FLEXIBILITY TECHNOLOGY TO HELP BALANCE SUPPLY AND DEMAND;
(C) INCREASED HARDENING AGAINST EXTREME WEATHER, CYBER
THREATS, AND DISRUPTIONS; AND
(D) FINANCING MECHANISMS THAT SPEED INFRASTRUCTURE
DEPLOYMENT;
(III) EMPHASIZE SOLAR ENERGY AND BATTERY STORAGE
SOLUTIONS, WHICH BENEFIT THE COMMUNITY BY:
(A) ADDING DISPATCHABLE CAPACITY WITH STORAGE, WHICH
IMPROVES PEAK FLEXIBILITY AND RELIABILITY;
(B) OFFERING FAST, LOW-COST, AND CLEAN ENERGY, WHICH IS
CRITICAL TO MEET RISING ELECTRICITY DEMAND;
(C) BOOSTING RESILIENCY, PROVIDING BACKUP POWER, LOWERING
-5- HB26-1030

PEAK ENERGY COSTS, AND INCREASING THE VALUE OF WIND AND SOLAR
ENERGY TECHNOLOGY;
(D) REDUCING FUTURE TRANSMISSION COSTS AND REDUCING
RELIANCE ON NEW GAS INFRASTRUCTURE; AND
(E) REDUCING HOUSEHOLD ELECTRICITY BILLS BY
APPROXIMATELY FIFTEEN PERCENT WITH COMBINED SOLAR AND BATTERY
SYSTEMS;
(IV) ENCOURAGE A TRANSITION TO CLEAN AND RENEWABLE
ENERGY THROUGH:
(A) ANCHORING NEW DISPATCHABLE RENEWABLE AND CLEAN
ENERGY RESOURCES;
(B) ACCELERATING THE DEPLOYMENT OF ADVANCED CLEAN
ENERGY TECHNOLOGY;
(C) FOLLOWING STRICT INTERNATIONAL BUILDING ENERGY
EFFICIENCY STANDARDS;
(D) RELYING ON INNOVATIVE, CLEAN, NON-CARBON BACKUP
POWER GENERATION SOURCES; AND
(E) IMPLEMENTING STATE-OF-THE-ART, WATER-EFFICIENT,
CLOSED-LOOP COOLING SYSTEMS; AND
(V) STRENGTHEN LOCAL AND COMMUNITY TAX BASES THROUGH:
(A) STABLE PROPERTY TAX FUNDING FOR SCHOOLS, LOCAL
SERVICES, AND INFRASTRUCTURE;
(B) SALES TAX FROM ELECTRICITY USE AND OPERATIONAL
EXPENDITURES;
(C) SUBSTANTIAL CAPITAL INVESTMENT IN PROPERTY AND
EQUIPMENT; AND
(D) ECONOMIC MULTIPLIERS FROM CONSTRUCTION, SUPPLY
-6- HB26-1030

CHAINS, AND OPERATIONS.
(2) THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY FURTHER FINDS AND DECLARES THAT
THE PURPOSE OF THE COLORADO DATA CENTER WORKFORCE, CLEAN
ENERGY, GRID MODERNIZATION, AND CONSUMER AND ENVIRONMENTAL
PROTECTION ACT IS TO:
(a) DRIVE THE EXPANSION OF COMMUNITY ACCESS TO SOLAR
GENERATION AND BATTERY STORAGE STATEWIDE;
(b) IMPROVE COMPETITIVENESS WITH TAX INCENTIVES TO ATTRACT
DATA CENTER INVESTMENT;
(c) ACCELERATE GRID MODERNIZATION AND INFRASTRUCTURE
THROUGH PRIVATE CONTRIBUTIONS;
(d) CREATE HIGH-WAGE TECHNOLOGY AND CONSTRUCTION JOBS
TO STRENGTHEN THE WORKFORCE;
(e) ENSURE RESPONSIBLE DEVELOPMENT WITH LOCAL
EMPLOYMENT AND COMMUNITY BENEFITS;
(f) STRENGTHEN LOCAL ECONOMIES, ESPECIALLY IN RURAL
COMMUNITIES AND COMMUNITIES IN TRANSITION;
(g) ADVANCE STATE POLICY GOALS WHILE MAINTAINING
RESOURCE RELIABILITY AND PROTECTING RATEPAYERS; AND
(h) ENHANCE LEADERSHIP IN TECHNOLOGICAL INNOVATION, CLEAN
AND RENEWABLE ENERGY, AND SUSTAINABLE GROWTH.
24-48.5-803. Definitions.
AS USED IN THIS PART 8, UNLESS THE CONTEXT OTHERWISE
REQUIRES:
(1) "CERTIFICATION" MEANS RECOGNITION GRANTED TO A DATA
CENTER BY THE AUTHORITY PURSUANT TO SECTION 24-48.5-807, UPON A
DETERMINATION THAT THE DATA CENTER MEETS THE REQUIREMENTS
-7- HB26-1030

SPECIFIED IN SECTION 24-48.5-806.
(2) "CERTIFIED DATA CENTER" MEANS A DATA CENTER THAT HAS
RECEIVED CERTIFICATION.
(3) "COLORADO DATA CENTER DEVELOPMENT AUTHORITY" OR
"AUTHORITY" MEANS THE COLORADO DATA CENTER DEVELOPMENT
AUTHORITY CREATED IN SECTION 24-28.5-804.
(4) "COMMISSION" MEANS THE PUBLIC UTILITIES COMMISSION OF
THE STATE OF COLORADO CREATED IN SECTION 40-2-101.
(5) "DATA CENTER" MEANS A FACILITY WITH ONE OR MORE
BUILDINGS, INCLUDING CORRESPONDING ELECTRICAL INFRASTRUCTURE,
THAT:
(a) HOUSES INFORMATION TECHNOLOGY EQUIPMENT USED FOR
DATA PROCESSING, DATA STORAGE, OR TELECOMMUNICATIONS; AND
(b) HAS A PRIMARY FUNCTION OF DELIVERING INFORMATION
TECHNOLOGY SERVICES, INCLUDING:
(I) PROVIDING DATA STORAGE, PROCESSING, AND TRANSPORT
SERVICES;
(II) SUPPORTING THE DELIVERY OF CLOUD COMPUTING SERVICES;
(III) PROVIDING NETWORK CONNECTIVITY SERVICES; AND
(IV) SUPPORTING ARTIFICIAL INTELLIGENCE, MACHINE LEARNING,
OR SIMILAR COMPUTATIONAL SERVICES.
(6) "DATA CENTER OPERATOR" MEANS A PERSON THAT OWNS OR
OPERATES A DATA CENTER IN THE STATE.
(7) "DATA CENTER TENANT" MEANS A CLIENT OR COLOCATION
TENANT OR LICENSEE OF A DATA CENTER, INCLUDING AN ENTITY THAT
LEASES, RENTS, OR OTHERWISE ENTERS INTO A CONTRACTUAL AGREEMENT
FOR THE USE OF DATA CENTER SPACE OR SERVICES, OR OTHERWISE
-8- HB26-1030

COLOCATES INFORMATION TECHNOLOGY EQUIPMENT WITHIN A DATA
CENTER.
(8) "DEPARTMENT" MEANS THE DEPARTMENT OF REVENUE.
(9) "OFFICE" MEANS THE OFFICE OF ECONOMIC DEVELOPMENT
CREATED IN SECTION 24-48.5-101.
(10) "PROGRAM" MEANS THE DATA CENTER DEVELOPMENT AND
INCENTIVE PROGRAM CREATED IN THIS PART 8.
(11) "QUALIFIED PURCHASE" MEANS THE PURCHASE, ON OR AFTER
JANUARY 1, 2027, OF:
(a) INFORMATION TECHNOLOGY INFRASTRUCTURE, INCLUDING:
(I) COMPUTER EQUIPMENT OR SOFTWARE USED IN THE OPERATION
OF OR FOR THE BENEFIT OF A CERTIFIED DATA CENTER;
(II) SOFTWARE SERVERS, ROUTERS, CONNECTIONS, MONITORING
AND SECURITY SYSTEMS, AND OTHER ENABLING MACHINERY, EQUIPMENT,
SOFTWARE, AND HARDWARE, REGARDLESS OF WHETHER THE PROPERTY IS
AFFIXED TO OR INCORPORATED INTO REAL PROPERTY;
(III) DATA STORAGE SYSTEMS; AND
(IV) NETWORK INFRASTRUCTURE; OR
(b) DATA CENTER INFRASTRUCTURE AND TRANSMISSION AND
GENERATION SYSTEM ASSETS, INCLUDING:
(I) ENVIRONMENTAL CONTROL SYSTEMS;
(II) ON-SITE ENERGY STORAGE SYSTEMS; AND
(III) ON-SITE RENEWABLE AND CLEAN ENERGY SYSTEMS.
(12) "RENEWABLE AND CLEAN ENERGY" MEANS ELECTRICITY
GENERATED FROM:
(a) SOURCES MEETING THE DEFINITION OF CLEAN ENERGY, AS
DEFINED IN SECTION 30-20-1202 (2); OR
-9- HB26-1030

(b) SOURCES QUALIFYING AS ELIGIBLE ENERGY RESOURCES
PURSUANT TO SECTION 40-2-124.
24-48.5-804. Colorado data center development authority -
office of economic development - creation - membership - powers and
duties - report.
(1) THE COLORADO DATA CENTER DEVELOPMENT AUTHORITY IS
CREATED IN THE OFFICE.
(2) (a) THE AUTHORITY CONSISTS OF NINE MEMBERS AS FOLLOWS:
(I) TWO MEMBERS APPOINTED BY THE GOVERNOR WITH THE
CONSENT OF THE SENATE;
(II) THE DIRECTOR OF THE COLORADO ENERGY OFFICE CREATED
IN SECTION 24-38.5-101 OR THE DIRECTOR'S DESIGNEE;
(III) ONE MEMBER WHO HAS EXPERIENCE IN WATER PROJECTS OR
WATER RESOURCE MANAGEMENT, APPOINTED BY THE PRESIDENT OF THE
SENATE;
(IV) ONE MEMBER WHO HAS EXPERIENCE IN CLEAN AND
RENEWABLE ENERGY, APPOINTED BY THE SPEAKER OF THE HOUSE OF
REPRESENTATIVES;
(V) TWO MEMBERS WHO HAVE EXPERIENCE IN DATA CENTER
DEVELOPMENT, WITH ONE MEMBER APPOINTED BY THE SPEAKER OF THE
HOUSE OF REPRESENTATIVES AND ONE MEMBER APPOINTED BY THE
PRESIDENT OF THE SENATE;
(VI) ONE MEMBER REPRESENTING A STATEWIDE ORGANIZATION
THAT REPRESENTS WORKERS IN TRADE CRAFTS WHO CONSTRUCT DATA
CENTERS, APPOINTED BY THE SPEAKER OF THE HOUSE OF
REPRESENTATIVES; AND
(VII) ONE MEMBER REPRESENTING A STATEWIDE ORGANIZATION
-10- HB26-1030

THAT REPRESENTS CONTRACTORS WHO CONSTRUCT DATA CENTERS,
APPOINTED BY THE PRESIDENT OF THE SENATE.
(b) (I) EXCEPT AS PROVIDED IN SUBSECTION (2)(b)(II) OF THIS
SECTION FOR THE INITIAL TERMS OF THE INITIALLY APPOINTED MEMBERS,
ALL APPOINTED MEMBERS OF THE AUTHORITY SERVE FOUR-YEAR TERMS.
MEMBERS OF THE AUTHORITY ARE ELIGIBLE FOR REAPPOINTMENT FOR
CONSECUTIVE TERMS.
(II) (A) ONE OF THE MEMBERS INITIALLY APPOINTED BY THE
GOVERNOR AND TWO OF THE MEMBERS INITIALLY APPOINTED BY THE
SPEAKER OF THE HOUSE OF REPRESENTATIVES SERVE INITIAL TERMS OF
THREE YEARS. ONE OF THE MEMBERS INITIALLY APPOINTED BY THE
GOVERNOR AND TWO OF THE MEMBERS INITIALLY APPOINTED BY THE
PRESIDENT OF THE SENATE SERVE INITIAL TERMS OF TWO YEARS. THE
REMAINDER OF THE INITIALLY APPOINTED MEMBERS SERVE INITIAL TERMS
OF FOUR YEARS. THE APPOINTING AUTHORITY SHALL DESIGNATE THE
INITIAL TERM LENGTH OF THE INITIALLY APPOINTED MEMBER.
(B) THE APPOINTING AUTHORITIES SHALL MAKE THEIR INITIAL
APPOINTMENTS AS SOON AS PRACTICABLE FOLLOWING THE EFFECTIVE
DATE OF THIS SECTION. APPOINTMENTS MADE WHILE THE SENATE IS NOT
IN SESSION ARE TEMPORARY APPOINTMENTS AND SUCH APPOINTEES SERVE
ON A TEMPORARY BASIS UNTIL THE SENATE IS IN SESSION AND IS ABLE TO
CONFIRM THE APPOINTMENTS.
(III) A VACANCY IN THE MEMBERSHIP OF THE AUTHORITY MUST BE
FILLED IN THE SAME MANNER AS THE ORIGINAL APPOINTMENT FOR THE
REMAINDER OF THE EXPIRED TERM.
(c) THE AUTHORITY SHALL SELECT A CHAIR AND A VICE CHAIR
FROM AMONG ITS MEMBERS.
-11- HB26-1030

(d) A TWO-THIRDS MAJORITY OF THE MEMBERS OF THE AUTHORITY
MAY REMOVE A MEMBER OF THE AUTHORITY FOR CAUSE.
(e) FIVE MEMBERS OF THE AUTHORITY CONSTITUTE A QUORUM.
(f) MEMBERS OF THE AUTHORITY SERVE WITHOUT COMPENSATION
BUT ARE ENTITLED TO REIMBURSEMENT FOR ACTUAL AND NECESSARY
EXPENSES INCURRED IN THE PERFORMANCE OF THEIR DUTIES.
(3) THE AUTHORITY HAS THE FOLLOWING POWERS AND DUTIES:
(a) TO ADMINISTER THE DATA CENTER DEVELOPMENT AND
INCENTIVE PROGRAM CREATED IN THIS PART 8, INCLUDING CREATING AND
MODIFYING POLICIES, PROCEDURES, AND GUIDELINES AS NECESSARY TO
IMPLEMENT THE PROGRAM AND THE TAX BENEFITS THAT MAY BE CLAIMED
PURSUANT TO THIS PART 8. THE AUTHORITY MAY MODIFY THE PROGRAM
REQUIREMENTS AS NECESSARY TO ACCOMPLISH THE PROGRAM'S GOALS,
PROVIDED THAT ALL PROGRAM REQUIREMENT MODIFICATIONS ARE
PROSPECTIVE AND NO MODIFICATION IMPAIRS AN IN-PROGRESS
APPLICATION FOR CERTIFICATION.
(b) TO ADOPT AN ANNUAL BUDGET;
(c) TO CONTRACT FOR THOSE SERVICES, INCLUDING PERSONNEL
SERVICES, AND MATERIALS REQUIRED BY THE ACTIVITIES OF THE
AUTHORITY;
(d) TO COLLECT THE FEES AUTHORIZED IN SECTION 24-48.5-805
(3);
(e) TO ADMINISTER THE DATA CENTER DEVELOPMENT AND
INCENTIVE PROGRAM CASH FUND CREATED IN SECTION 24-48.5-805 (4);
AND
(f) TO EXERCISE ANY OTHER POWERS OR PERFORM ANY OTHER
DUTIES THAT ARE CONSISTENT WITH THE PURPOSES FOR WHICH THE
-12- HB26-1030

AUTHORITY WAS CREATED AND THAT ARE REASONABLY NECESSARY FOR
THE FULFILLMENT OF THE AUTHORITY'S RESPONSIBILITIES.
(4) (a) ON OR BEFORE JANUARY 31, 2027, AND ON OR BEFORE
EACH JANUARY 31 THEREAFTER, THE AUTHORITY SHALL REPORT ON THE
PROGRAM TO A JOINT SESSION OF THE HOUSE OF REPRESENTATIVES
ENERGY AND ENVIRONMENT COMMITTEE AND THE SENATE
TRANSPORTATION AND ENERGY COMMITTEE, OR THEIR SUCCESSOR
COMMITTEES. THE AUTHORITY SHALL MAKE EACH ANNUAL REPORT
PUBLICLY AVAILABLE.
(b) NOTWITHSTANDING THE REQUIREMENT IN SECTION 24-1-136
(11)(a)(I), THE REQUIREMENT TO SUBMIT THE REPORT REQUIRED IN THIS
SUBSECTION (4) CONTINUES INDEFINITELY.
(5) THE OFFICE SHALL, WITHIN EXISTING RESOURCES, PROVIDE
STAFFING, ADMINISTRATIVE, AND OPERATIONAL SUPPORT TO THE
AUTHORITY IN PERFORMING ITS DUTIES.
24-48.5-805. Data center development and incentive program
- data center development and incentive program cash fund - fees -
guidelines.
(1) THE DATA CENTER DEVELOPMENT AND INCENTIVE PROGRAM
IS CREATED TO FACILITATE EFFICIENT DATA CENTER DEVELOPMENT BY
ALLOWING TAX RELIEF TO A DATA CENTER OPERATOR OF A CERTIFIED
DATA CENTER, AS PROVIDED IN THIS PART 8.
(2) (a) THE AUTHORITY SHALL ADMINISTER THE PROGRAM.
(b) THE AUTHORITY MAY CREATE AND MODIFY POLICIES,
PROCEDURES, AND GUIDELINES AS NECESSARY TO IMPLEMENT THE
PROGRAM AND TAX BENEFITS THAT MAY BE CLAIMED PURSUANT TO THIS
PART 8.
-13- HB26-1030

(3) (a) (I) TO RECOVER THE DIRECT COSTS OF ESTABLISHING AND
IMPLEMENTING THE PROGRAM, THE AUTHORITY MAY:
(A) ESTABLISH AND COLLECT A NONREFUNDABLE APPLICATION FEE
NOT TO EXCEED THIRTY THOUSAND DOLLARS FOR EACH APPLICATION FOR
CERTIFICATION SUBMITTED PURSUANT TO THIS PART 8; AND
(B) ESTABLISH AND COLLECT A NONREFUNDABLE CERTIFICATION
FEE NOT TO EXCEED TWENTY THOUSAND DOLLARS FOR EACH
CERTIFICATION AWARDED PURSUANT TO THIS PART 8.
(II) THE AUTHORITY SHALL DEPOSIT ALL FEES COLLECTED
PURSUANT TO SUBSECTION (3)(a)(I) OF THIS SECTION INTO THE DATA
CENTER DEVELOPMENT AND INCENTIVE PROGRAM CASH FUND CREATED IN
SUBSECTION (4) OF THIS SECTION.
(b) THE AUTHORITY SHALL:
(I) SET THE AMOUNT OF ANY FEES ESTABLISHED PURSUANT TO THIS
SUBSECTION (3) AT THE MINIMUM AMOUNT NECESSARY TO OFFSET THE
AUTHORITY'S DIRECT COSTS OF IMPLEMENTING ITS RESPONSIBILITIES
UNDER THIS PART 8; AND
(II) ANNUALLY REVIEW THE FEES AND ADJUST THE AMOUNTS AS
NECESSARY TO ENSURE THAT THE FEES DO NOT EXCEED THE DIRECT COSTS
OF IMPLEMENTING THIS PART 8.
(4) (a) THE DATA CENTER DEVELOPMENT AND INCENTIVE
PROGRAM CASH FUND IS CREATED IN THE STATE TREASURY. THE DATA
CENTER DEVELOPMENT AND INCENTIVE PROGRAM CASH FUND CONSISTS OF
MONEY FROM FEES COLLECTED AND CREDITED TO THE FUND PURSUANT
THIS SECTION AND ANY OTHER MONEY THAT THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY MAY
APPROPRIATE, TRANSFER, OR REQUIRE BY LAW TO BE CREDITED TO THE
FUND.
-14- HB26-1030

(b) THE STATE TREASURER SHALL CREDIT ALL INTEREST AND
INCOME DERIVED FROM THE DEPOSIT AND INVESTMENT OF MONEY IN THE
DATA CENTER DEVELOPMENT AND INCENTIVE PROGRAM CASH FUND TO
THE FUND.
(c) MONEY IN THE DATA CENTER DEVELOPMENT AND INCENTIVE
PROGRAM CASH FUND IS CONTINUOUSLY APPROPRIATED TO THE
AUTHORITY FOR THE PURPOSE OF ADMINISTERING THE PROGRAM.
(d) THE DATA CENTER DEVELOPMENT AND INCENTIVE PROGRAM
CASH FUND IS EXCLUDED FROM THE LIMITATIONS SPECIFIED IN SECTION
24-75-402.
24-48.5-806. Certification - application process - data center
operators - minimum commitments.
(1) Minimum certification commitments. TO QUALIFY FOR
CERTIFICATION PURSUANT TO THIS PART 8, A DATA CENTER OPERATOR, OR
A DATA CENTER OPERATOR COLLECTIVELY WITH ITS PARTICIPATING DATA
CENTER TENANTS, SHALL COMMIT TO:
(a) MAKING A MINIMUM INVESTMENT OF TWO HUNDRED FIFTY
MILLION DOLLARS IN DATA CENTER QUALIFIED PURCHASES WITHIN SIXTY
MONTHS OF OBTAINING CERTIFICATION;
(b) CREATING, WITHIN SIXTY MONTHS OF THE DATA CENTER'S
RECEIPT OF A FINAL CERTIFICATE OF OCCUPANCY, AND MAINTAINING NEW
FULL-TIME EQUIVALENT JOBS, INCLUDING EMPLOYEES AND LONG-TERM
SERVICE AND MAINTENANCE POSITIONS, WITH AN AVERAGE
COMPENSATION OF AT LEAST ONE HUNDRED TEN PERCENT OF THE
AVERAGE WAGE IN THE COUNTY IN WHICH THE DATA CENTER WILL BE
LOCATED;
(c) HIRING CONTRACTORS TO BUILD AND SERVICE THE DATA
-15- HB26-1030

CENTER;
(d) WORKING TO ENSURE THAT THE DATA CENTER WILL NOT CAUSE
UNREASONABLE COST IMPACTS TO OTHER UTILITY RATEPAYERS;
(e) IMPLEMENTING WATER STEWARDSHIP MEASURES THAT
OPTIMIZE OPERATIONAL WATER MANAGEMENT THROUGH
IMPLEMENTATION OF CLOSED-LOOP COOLING SYSTEMS OR COOLING
SYSTEM TECHNOLOGY THAT DOES NOT USE WATER, AND THE OPTIONAL
DEPLOYMENT OF ADDITIONAL WATER-EFFICIENT TECHNOLOGY;
(f) OBTAINING CERTIFICATION UNDER ONE OF THE FOLLOWING
STANDARDS WITHIN TWENTY-FOUR MONTHS OF THE DATA CENTER'S
RECEIPT OF A FINAL CERTIFICATE OF OCCUPANCY:
(I) LEED FOR DATA CENTERS AT GOLD LEVEL OR HIGHER;
(II) ENERGY STAR CERTIFICATION;
(III) GREEN GLOBES CERTIFICATION;
(IV) ISO 50001 ENERGY MANAGEMENT CERTIFICATION;
(V) ISO 14001 STANDARD FOR ENVIRONMENTAL MANAGEMENT
SYSTEMS; OR
(VI) OTHER EQUIVALENT STANDARDS APPROVED BY THE
AUTHORITY;
(g) CONSULTING WITH THE DEPARTMENT OF NATURAL RESOURCES
REGARDING WILDLIFE AREAS, WILDFIRE AND URBAN INTERFACE, AND
WATER;
(h) ENSURING THAT ALL BACKUP POWER GENERATION ASSOCIATED
WITH THE DATA CENTER MEETS ONE OR MORE OF THE REQUIREMENTS
LISTED IN SUBSECTIONS (1)(h)(I) TO (1)(h)(IV) OF THIS SECTION; EXCEPT
THAT THE AUTHORITY MAY GRANT ADDITIONAL TIME FOR COMPLIANCE
WITH THIS SUBSECTION (1)(h) IF A DATA CENTER OPERATOR
-16- HB26-1030

DEMONSTRATES REASONABLE EFFORTS TO COMPLY BUT REQUIRES
ADDITIONAL TIME DUE TO EQUIPMENT AVAILABILITY OR SUPPLY CHAIN
CONSTRAINTS DUE TO FACTORS OUTSIDE THE CONTROL OF THE DATA
CENTER OPERATOR.
(I) FOR DIESEL GENERATORS, THE GENERATOR MUST:
(A) MEET OR EXCEED THE UNITED STATES ENVIRONMENTAL
PROTECTION AGENCY'S TIER 4 FINAL EMISSIONS STANDARDS; OR
(B) MEET OR EXCEED THE UNITED STATES ENVIRONMENTAL
PROTECTION AGENCY'S TIER 2 EMISSIONS STANDARDS AND BE EQUIPPED
WITH A SELECTIVE CATALYTIC REDUCTION SYSTEM OR EQUIVALENT
AFTER-TREATMENT TECHNOLOGY.
(II) THE BACKUP POWER GENERATION MUST BE A BATTERY
ELECTRIC STORAGE SYSTEM.
(III) THE BACKUP POWER GENERATION MUST BE FROM ONE OR
MORE OF THE FOLLOWING SOURCES:
(A) HYDROTREATED VEGETABLE OIL, ETHICAL BIOFUEL OIL, OR
ONE HUNDRED PERCENT BIODIESEL;
(B) FUEL-CELL OR HYDROGEN FUEL;
(C) NATURAL GAS; OR
(D) AMMONIA.
(IV) THE BACKUP POWER GENERATION MUST BE FROM OTHER
CLEAN OR LOW-EMISSION BACKUP POWER TECHNOLOGIES APPROVED BY
THE AUTHORITY.
(i) BREAKING GROUND ON THE DATA CENTER WITHIN
TWENTY-FOUR MONTHS OF OBTAINING CERTIFICATION;
(j) COMPLYING WITH, AND ENSURING THAT THE UTILITY THAT WILL
PROVIDE ELECTRICITY TO THE DATA CENTER COMPLIES WITH, FOR THE
-17- HB26-1030

ENTIRETY OF THE CONSTRUCTION PHASE OF THE DATA CENTER AND FOR
ANY SUBSEQUENT SERVICE AND MAINTENANCE WORK, THE CRAFT LABOR
REQUIREMENTS IN PART 3 OF ARTICLE 92 OF THIS TITLE 24 AND THE
APPRENTICESHIP UTILIZATION REQUIREMENTS IN SECTION 24-92-115 (7),
IF THE PROJECT FOR THE DATA CENTER, THE ELECTRIC UTILITY
INFRASTRUCTURE ATTACHED TO THE DATA CENTER, OR THE ELECTRICAL
POWER GENERATION TECHNOLOGY ATTACHED TO THE DATA CENTER
MEETS THE DEFINITION OF AN ENERGY SECTOR PUBLIC WORKS PROJECT AS
DEFINED IN SECTION 24-92-303 (5);
(k) COMPLYING WITH THE PREVAILING WAGE REQUIREMENTS IN
PART 2 OF ARTICLE 92 OF THIS TITLE 24, AS IF THE PROJECT FOR THE DATA
CENTER SATISFIED THE CRITERIA FOR A PUBLIC PROJECT AS DESCRIBED IN
SECTION 24-92-203 (1);
(l) AGREEING TO FILE, AND ENSURING THAT ALL CONTRACTORS
ASSOCIATED WITH CONSTRUCTION OF THE DATA CENTER FILE AS PART OF
THE BID PROCESS, WORKER SAFETY PLANS THAT INCLUDE PROVISIONS FOR
COMPLIANCE WITH ALL FEDERAL OCCUPATIONAL SAFETY AND HEALTH
ADMINISTRATION STANDARDS AND APPLICABLE STATE AND FEDERAL
WORKPLACE SAFETY LAWS; AND
(m) COMMITTING TO SATISFYING THE POST-CERTIFICATION DATA
CENTER REQUIREMENTS SPECIFIED IN SECTION 24-48.5-809.
(2) Preliminary electric utility consultation.
(a) BEFORE SUBMITTING AN APPLICATION FOR CERTIFICATION, A
DATA CENTER OPERATOR SHALL INITIATE A PRELIMINARY CONSULTATION
WITH THE UTILITY THAT WILL PROVIDE ELECTRICITY FOR THE DATA
CENTER REGARDING INTERCONNECTION FEASIBILITY, CAPACITY, AND
INFRASTRUCTURE REQUIREMENTS.
-18- HB26-1030

(b) A DATA CENTER OPERATOR IS RESPONSIBLE FOR PAYING ALL
COSTS THAT AN ELECTRIC UTILITY WILL INCUR FOR THE PLANNING TO
PROVIDE ELECTRICITY TO A NEW DATA CENTER.
(3) Application for certification. A DATA CENTER OPERATOR
SEEKING CERTIFICATION MUST SUBMIT AN APPLICATION TO THE
AUTHORITY, IN A FORM AND MANNER DETERMINED BY THE AUTHORITY,
THAT INCLUDES THE FOLLOWING:
(a) INFORMATION ABOUT THE DATA CENTER FOR WHICH THE DATA
CENTER OPERATOR IS SEEKING CERTIFICATION, INCLUDING:
(I) THE IDENTITY AND QUALIFICATIONS OF THE DATA CENTER
OPERATOR;
(II) EVIDENCE OF SITE CONTROL OR A PATHWAY TO SITE CONTROL;
(III) A PROPOSED DEVELOPMENT TIMELINE AND PHASING;
(IV) AN ESTIMATED TIMELINE FOR QUALIFIED PURCHASES
REACHING A MINIMUM OF TWO HUNDRED FIFTY MILLION DOLLARS WITHIN
THIRTY-SIX MONTHS OF THE DATA CENTER BEING PLACED IN SERVICE OR
RECEIPT OF A FINAL CERTIFICATE OF OCCUPANCY, WHICHEVER IS EARLIER;
(V) AN ESTIMATED JOB CREATION PLAN BY THE DATA CENTER
OPERATOR, OR BY THE DATA CENTER OPERATOR COLLECTIVELY WITH ITS
PARTICIPATING DATA CENTER TENANTS, SHOWING THE ANTICIPATED
NUMBER OF NEW FULL-TIME EQUIVALENT JOBS THAT WILL BE CREATED
WITHIN SIXTY MONTHS AFTER THE DATA CENTER'S RECEIPT OF A FINAL
CERTIFICATE OF OCCUPANCY, INCLUDING EMPLOYEES AND LONG-TERM
SERVICE AND MAINTENANCE POSITIONS, WITH COMPENSATION OF AT LEAST
ONE HUNDRED TEN PERCENT OF THE AVERAGE WAGE FOR THE COUNTY IN
WHICH THE DATA CENTER WILL BE LOCATED; AND
(VI) AN ENVIRONMENTAL SUSTAINABILITY PLAN FOR THE DATA
-19- HB26-1030

CENTER THAT INCLUDES:
(A) A FACILITY CERTIFICATION COMMITMENT, INCLUDING LEED,
ENERGY STAR, GREEN GLOBES, ISO 50001, ISO 14001, OR AN
EQUIVALENT STANDARD; AND
(B) CONSULTATION WITH DEPARTMENT OF NATURAL RESOURCES;
(b) THE IDENTITY OF THE UTILITY THAT WILL PROVIDE
ELECTRICITY FOR THE DATA CENTER AND EXPECTED PEAK ELECTRICITY
DEMAND FOR THE DATA CENTER;
(c) DOCUMENTATION OF THE PRELIMINARY CONSULTATION WITH
THE UTILITY THAT WILL PROVIDE ELECTRICITY TO THE DATA CENTER AS
REQUIRED BY SUBSECTION (2)(a) OF THIS SECTION;
(d) INFORMATION ABOUT WHETHER THE DATA CENTER WILL USE
WATER AS PART OF ITS COOLING SYSTEM AND, IF WATER WILL BE USED,
THE IDENTITY OF THE UTILITY THAT WILL PROVIDE WATER FOR THE DATA
CENTER; AND
(e) LOCAL GOVERNMENT DOCUMENTATION IN CONNECTION WITH
THE DATA CENTER, INCLUDING:
(I) DOCUMENTATION OF THE STATUS OF THE LAND USE
APPLICATION FROM THE LOCAL GOVERNMENTAL ENTITY THAT WILL
PROVIDE THE PERMIT FOR THE DATA CENTER, IF AVAILABLE;
(II) A DESCRIPTION OF ANY APPLICABLE LOCAL INCENTIVES;
(III) A DESCRIPTION OF THE NEGOTIATED COMMUNITY BENEFITS;
AND
(IV) THE STATUS OF LOCAL PERMITS AND APPROVALS.
(4) Review and effect of certification. UPON RECEIPT OF AN
APPLICATION FOR CERTIFICATION FROM A DATA CENTER OPERATOR, THE
AUTHORITY SHALL REVIEW THE APPLICATION PURSUANT TO SECTION
-20- HB26-1030

24-48.5-807. IF THE AUTHORITY APPROVES THE DATA CENTER FOR
CERTIFICATION, THE DATA CENTER OPERATOR BECOMES ELIGIBLE, AS OF
THE DATE OF CERTIFICATION, FOR THE TAX BENEFITS SPECIFIED IN SECTION
24-48.5-808.
24-48.5-807. Application review and certification process -
Colorado data center development authority.
(1) (a) THE AUTHORITY SHALL REVIEW ALL APPLICATIONS FOR
CERTIFICATION SUBMITTED BY A DATA CENTER OPERATOR PURSUANT TO
SECTION 24-48.5-806. THE AUTHORITY SHALL DETERMINE WHETHER AN
APPLICATION IS COMPLETE WITHIN THIRTY DAYS AFTER THE AUTHORITY'S
RECEIPT OF THE APPLICATION. WITHIN NINETY DAYS OF DETERMINING
THAT AN APPLICATION IS COMPLETE, THE AUTHORITY SHALL CONDUCT A
FULL APPLICATION REVIEW PURSUANT TO THIS SECTION.
(b) IF THE AUTHORITY DETERMINES THAT AN APPLICATION IS
DEFICIENT, THE AUTHORITY SHALL PROVIDE WRITTEN NOTIFICATION TO
THE APPLICANT THAT IDENTIFIES THE SPECIFIC DEFICIENCIES. THE
AUTHORITY SHALL ALLOW THIRTY DAYS FOR THE APPLICANT TO CURE ANY
DEFICIENCIES IN THE APPLICATION, AND THE AUTHORITY SHALL COMPLETE
A REVIEW OF THE REVISED APPLICATION WITHIN THIRTY DAYS AFTER
RECEIPT.
(c) WITHIN FOURTEEN DAYS OF RECEIVING A COMPLETE
APPLICATION FOR CERTIFICATION FROM A DATA CENTER OPERATOR, THE
AUTHORITY SHALL NOTIFY THE UTILITY THAT WILL PROVIDE ELECTRICITY
FOR THE DATA CENTER, AS IDENTIFIED IN THE APPLICATION, OF THE
APPLICATION. WITHIN SIXTY DAYS OF THE DATE THAT THE AUTHORITY
NOTIFIES THE UTILITY, THE UTILITY SHALL:
(I) PURSUE ONE OF THE FOLLOWING METHODS TO VERIFY THAT THE
-21- HB26-1030

DATA CENTER WILL NOT CAUSE UNREASONABLE COST IMPACTS TO OTHER
UTILITY RATEPAYERS:
(A) SUBMITTING A TARGETED RESOURCE ACQUISITION
APPLICATION TO THE COMMISSION PURSUANT TO SECTION 40-2-140 AND
PROVIDING PROOF OF THE APPLICATION SUBMISSION TO THE AUTHORITY;
(B) PROVIDING A TECHNICAL REPORT TO THE AUTHORITY
ATTESTING THAT THE UTILITY INFRASTRUCTURE COSTS ASSOCIATED WITH
THE DATA CENTER ARE REASONABLY ALLOCATED AND ARE NOT EXPECTED
TO CAUSE UNJUSTIFIED RATE INCREASES FOR OTHER CUSTOMERS; OR
(C) PROVIDING DOCUMENTATION TO THE AUTHORITY OF A
PROPOSED INTERCONNECTION AGREEMENT, ELECTRIC SERVICE
AGREEMENT, OR SIMILAR AGREEMENT THAT IDENTIFIES REQUIRED UTILITY
INFRASTRUCTURE UPGRADES AND CONFIRMS THAT THE DATA CENTER
OPERATOR HAS AGREED OR WILL AGREE TO COVER ITS FAIR SHARE OF
COSTS IN ACCORDANCE WITH THE UTILITY'S POLICY; AND
(II) PROVIDE A WRITTEN FEASIBILITY ASSESSMENT TO THE
AUTHORITY THAT INCLUDES A TIMELINE OF SERVICE.
(d) WITHIN FOURTEEN DAYS OF RECEIVING A COMPLETE
APPLICATION FOR CERTIFICATION FROM A DATA CENTER OPERATOR THAT
IDENTIFIES THAT THE DATA CENTER WILL USE WATER AS PART OF ITS
COOLING SYSTEM, THE AUTHORITY SHALL NOTIFY THE UTILITY THAT WILL
PROVIDE WATER FOR THE DATA CENTER, AS IDENTIFIED IN THE
APPLICATION, OF THE APPLICATION. WITHIN SIXTY DAYS OF THE DATE
THAT THE AUTHORITY NOTIFIES THE UTILITY, THE UTILITY SHALL PROVIDE
DOCUMENTATION TO THE AUTHORITY ATTESTING THAT THE WATER
MANAGEMENT PLAN FOR THE DATA CENTER IS SUFFICIENT AND WILL NOT
NEGATIVELY IMPACT EXISTING CUSTOMERS EITHER THROUGH RATE
-22- HB26-1030

INCREASES OR WATER AVAILABILITY.
(e) (I) IF A UTILITY FAILS TO PROVIDE THE AUTHORITY WITH ANY
DOCUMENTATION, REPORT, ASSESSMENT, OR APPLICATION REQUIRED BY
SUBSECTION (1)(c) OR (1)(d) OF THIS SECTION WITHIN THE REQUIRED TIME
FRAME, THE AUTHORITY MAY PROCEED TO REVIEW AND APPROVE AN
APPLICATION FOR CERTIFICATION WITHOUT THE REQUIRED
DOCUMENTATION, REPORT, ASSESSMENT, OR APPLICATION. THE
DOCUMENTATION, REPORT, ASSESSMENT, OR APPLICATION MUST BE ADDED
TO THE APPLICATION FOR CERTIFICATION UPON THE AUTHORITY'S RECEIPT
OF THE DOCUMENTATION, REPORT, ASSESSMENT, OR APPLICATION.
(II) IF AN ELECTRIC UTILITY FAILS TO PROVIDE THE AUTHORITY
WITH A WRITTEN FEASIBILITY ASSESSMENT REQUIRED BY SUBSECTION
(1)(c)(II) OF THIS SECTION WITHIN THE SIXTY-DAY TIME FRAME, THE
AUTHORITY SHALL NOTIFY THE APPLICANT DATA CENTER OPERATOR AND
THE COMMISSION OF THE ELECTRIC UTILITY'S FAILURE TO RESPOND.
(2) THE AUTHORITY MAY APPROVE AN APPLICATION FOR
CERTIFICATION IF THE APPLICATION MEETS ALL OF THE APPLICATION
CRITERIA SPECIFIED IN SECTION 24-48.5-806.
(3) THE AUTHORITY MAY REJECT AN APPLICATION IF:
(a) THE AUTHORITY FINDS THAT THE DATA CENTER OPERATOR
MATERIALLY MISREPRESENTED FACTS IN THE APPLICATION;
(b) THE AUTHORITY FINDS THAT THE DATA CENTER OPERATOR
FAILED TO PROVIDE REQUIRED DOCUMENTATION AFTER THE AUTHORITY
PROVIDED AN OPPORTUNITY TO CURE AN APPLICATION DEFICIENCY
PURSUANT TO SUBSECTION (1)(b) OF THIS SECTION;
(c) THE AUTHORITY DETERMINES THAT THE DATA CENTER
OPERATOR DOES NOT MEET MINIMUM CERTIFICATION REQUIREMENTS
-23- HB26-1030

UNDER SECTION 24-48.5-806; OR
(d) THE PROGRAM IS CANCELED OR REPEALED PRIOR TO THE
AUTHORITY'S REVIEW AND APPROVAL OF THE APPLICATION.
(4) BEFORE REJECTING ANY APPLICATION THAT MEETS THE
MINIMUM INVESTMENT AND JOB CREATION CRITERIA SET FORTH IN
SECTION 24-48.5-806, THE AUTHORITY SHALL:
(a) PROVIDE THE DATA CENTER OPERATOR AN OPPORTUNITY TO
ADDRESS THE AUTHORITY'S CONCERNS; AND
(b) EXPLORE ALTERNATIVE PATHS TO APPROVAL WITH
CONDITIONS, IF POSSIBLE.
(5) IN IMPLEMENTING THE PROGRAM, THE AUTHORITY SHALL
FACILITATE EFFICIENT DATA CENTER DEVELOPMENT BY ESTABLISHING
CLEAR QUALIFICATION CRITERIA AND CONSISTENTLY ADMINISTERING A
PREDICTABLE APPLICATION, REVIEW, AND APPROVAL PROCESS FOR DATA
CENTER CERTIFICATION PURSUANT TO THIS PART 8.
(6) (a) THE AUTHORITY SHALL BEGIN PROCESSING AND REVIEWING
APPLICATIONS FOR CERTIFICATION WITHIN ONE HUNDRED EIGHTY DAYS
AFTER THE EFFECTIVE DATE OF THIS PART 8.
(b) THIS SUBSECTION (6) IS REPEALED, EFFECTIVE JULY 1, 2028.
24-48.5-808. Certification benefits - state sales and use tax
exemption - compliance reports.
(1) State sales and use tax exemption.
(a) SUBJECT TO THE PROVISIONS OF SUBSECTION (1)(b) OF THIS
SECTION, A DATA CENTER OPERATOR OF A CERTIFIED DATA CENTER IS
ELIGIBLE FOR A ONE HUNDRED PERCENT STATE SALES AND USE TAX
EXEMPTION ON QUALIFIED PURCHASES PURSUANT TO SECTION 39-26-735.
(b) UNLESS AN ELIGIBILITY PERIOD IS EXTENDED AS PROVIDED IN
-24- HB26-1030

SECTION 24-48.5-810, A DATA CENTER OPERATOR OF A CERTIFIED DATA
CENTER IS ELIGIBLE FOR THE STATE SALES AND USE TAX EXEMPTION FOR
TWENTY YEARS FROM THE DATE THAT THE DATA CENTER RECEIVED
CERTIFICATION, SO LONG AS THE DATA CENTER OPERATOR:
(I) MAINTAINS THE QUALIFYING EMPLOYMENT AND
COMPENSATION COMMITMENT SPECIFIED IN SECTION 24-48.5-806 (1)(b);
AND
(II) SUBMITS ANNUAL COMPLIANCE REPORTS TO THE AUTHORITY
AS REQUIRED IN SUBSECTION (3) OF THIS SECTION.
(2) Exemption certificate. THE AUTHORITY SHALL ISSUE A STATE
SALES AND USE TAX EXEMPTION CERTIFICATE TO THE DATA CENTER
OPERATOR OF A CERTIFIED DATA CENTER AS EVIDENCE THAT THE DATA
CENTER OPERATOR IS ELIGIBLE FOR THE STATE SALES AND USE TAX
EXEMPTION FOR QUALIFIED PURCHASES PURSUANT TO THIS SECTION AND
SECTION 39-26-735. THE STATE SALES AND USE TAX EXEMPTION
CERTIFICATE MUST SPECIFY THAT THE DATA CENTER OPERATOR IS
ENTITLED TO THE STATE SALES AND USE TAX EXEMPTION FOR TWENTY
YEARS, BEGINNING ON THE DATE OF CERTIFICATION. A STATE SALES AND
USE TAX EXEMPTION CERTIFICATE IS NONTRANSFERABLE. THE AUTHORITY
SHALL CERTIFY TO THE DEPARTMENT THE NAME OF EACH DATA CENTER
OPERATOR THAT RECEIVES A STATE SALES AND USE TAX EXEMPTION
CERTIFICATE AND OTHER RELEVANT INFORMATION RELATING TO THE
EXEMPTION.
(3) Compliance reports. A DATA CENTER OPERATOR OF A
CERTIFIED DATA CENTER SHALL SUBMIT AN ANNUAL COMPLIANCE REPORT
TO THE AUTHORITY, IN A FORM AND MANNER TO BE DETERMINED BY THE
AUTHORITY, TO VERIFY THAT THE DATA CENTER OPERATOR IS MAKING
-25- HB26-1030

TIMELY PROGRESS IN SATISFYING THE REQUIREMENTS OF SECTION
24-48.5-806 AND IS ON TRACK TO SATISFY THE REQUIREMENTS WITHIN THE
PERIODS SPECIFIED IN THAT SECTION. A DATA CENTER OPERATOR SHALL
SUBMIT THE REPORT REQUIRED IN THIS SUBSECTION (3) TO MAINTAIN
CERTIFICATION. THE DATA CENTER OPERATOR SHALL INCLUDE IN THE
REPORT THE TOTAL AMOUNT OF THE STATE SALES AND USE TAX
EXEMPTION CLAIMED EACH YEAR AND ANY OTHER INFORMATION
REQUESTED BY THE AUTHORITY.
(4) Payment of tax upon revocation of certification. IF THE
AUTHORITY REVOKES A DATA CENTER'S CERTIFICATION PURSUANT TO
SECTION 24-48.5-809 (2), THE DATA CENTER OPERATOR SHALL PAY THE
ENTIRE AMOUNT OF THE STATE SALES AND USE TAX ON ANY QUALIFIED
PURCHASE FOR WHICH THE STATE SALES AND USE TAX EXEMPTION WAS
CLAIMED PURSUANT TO THIS PART 8 AND SECTION 39-26-735.
24-48.5-809. Post-certification data center requirements -
revocation.
(1) A DATA CENTER OPERATOR OF A CERTIFIED DATA CENTER
SHALL:
(a) MAINTAIN ALL COMMITMENTS AND REQUIREMENTS SET FORTH
IN SECTION 24-48.5-806 THROUGHOUT ITS TWENTY-YEAR BENEFIT PERIOD;
AND
(b) SUBMIT THE ANNUAL COMPLIANCE REPORTS REQUIRED BY
SECTION 24-48.5-808 (3).
(2) (a) EXCEPT AS PROVIDED IN SUBSECTION (4) OF THIS SECTION,
THE AUTHORITY MAY REVOKE A CERTIFICATION THAT IT HAS AWARDED IF
THE AUTHORITY DETERMINES THAT THE DATA CENTER OPERATOR HAS:
(I) FAILED TO MAKE SUBSTANTIAL PROGRESS TOWARD SATISFYING
-26- HB26-1030

THE REQUIREMENTS SPECIFIED IN SECTION 24-48.5-806 WITHIN
TWENTY-FOUR MONTHS OF THE DATA CENTER BEING PLACED IN SERVICE
OR RECEIPT OF A FINAL CERTIFICATE OF OCCUPANCY;
(II) MATERIALLY CHANGED THE DATA CENTER IN A WAY THAT
WOULD HAVE DISQUALIFIED IT FROM CERTIFICATION; OR
(III) FAILED TO MAINTAIN COMPLIANCE WITH THE CRITERIA THAT
FORMED THE BASIS OF APPROVAL AND CERTIFICATION.
(b) BEFORE REVOKING A CERTIFICATION THAT IT HAS AWARDED,
THE AUTHORITY SHALL PROVIDE THE DATA CENTER OPERATOR WITH:
(I) WRITTEN NOTICE SPECIFYING THE GROUNDS FOR POTENTIAL
REVOCATION;
(II) AT LEAST ONE HUNDRED TWENTY DAYS TO REMEDY THE
GROUNDS FOR POTENTIAL REVOCATION AND TO DEMONSTRATE
COMPLIANCE; AND
(III) AN OPPORTUNITY TO PRESENT EVIDENCE AND ARGUMENTS TO
THE AUTHORITY.
(3) THE AUTHORITY SHALL USE THE REPORTS THAT A DATA CENTER
OPERATOR IS REQUIRED TO SUBMIT TO THE AUTHORITY PURSUANT TO
SECTION 24-48.5-808 (3) TO ENSURE THAT A CERTIFIED DATA CENTER
REMAINS IN COMPLIANCE WITH PROGRAM REQUIREMENTS.
(4) THE AUTHORITY SHALL NOT REVOKE CERTIFICATION BASED ON:
(a) CHANGES TO ELECTRIC UTILITY RATES, COST ALLOCATIONS, OR
RESOURCE PLANS MADE THROUGH PROCEEDINGS BEFORE THE
COMMISSION;
(b) CHANGES TO WATER UTILITY RATES OR SERVICE TERMS MADE
BY A WATER UTILITY, UNLESS SUCH CHANGES ARE CAUSED BY WATER
SCARCITY OR FORCE MAJEURE; OR
-27- HB26-1030

(c) CHANGES TO FEDERAL, STATE, OR LOCAL ENVIRONMENTAL
LAWS OR REGULATIONS THAT OCCUR AFTER A DATA CENTER'S
CERTIFICATION, PROVIDED THAT THE DATA CENTER OPERATOR
DEMONSTRATES GOOD FAITH EFFORTS TO ACHIEVE COMPLIANCE WITH THE
CHANGED LAWS OR REGULATIONS WITHIN A REASONABLE TIME.
24-48.5-810. Certification benefits extension - duration -
extension eligibility - extension terms.
(1) A DATA CENTER OPERATOR OF A CERTIFIED DATA CENTER MAY
APPLY TO THE AUTHORITY, IN A FORM AND MANNER DETERMINED BY THE
AUTHORITY AND NO EARLIER THAN TEN YEARS AFTER OBTAINING ITS
INITIAL CERTIFICATION, FOR AN EXTENSION OF ITS CERTIFICATION
BENEFITS. TO BE ELIGIBLE FOR AN EXTENSION OF ITS CERTIFICATION
BENEFITS, A DATA CENTER OPERATOR MUST DEMONSTRATE THAT:
(a) DURING THE INITIAL TWENTY-YEAR BENEFIT PERIOD, THE DATA
CENTER OPERATOR, OR THE DATA CENTER OPERATOR COLLECTIVELY WITH
ITS PARTICIPATING DATA CENTER TENANTS, HAS MADE INVESTMENTS IN
DATA CENTER QUALIFIED PURCHASES IN A TOTAL AMOUNT OF AT LEAST
FIVE MILLION DOLLARS IN ADDITION TO THE MINIMUM INVESTMENT THAT
THE DATA CENTER OPERATOR WAS REQUIRED TO MAKE PURSUANT TO
SECTION 24-48.5-806;
(b) DURING THE INITIAL TWENTY-YEAR BENEFIT PERIOD, THE DATA
CENTER OPERATOR, OR THE DATA CENTER OPERATOR COLLECTIVELY WITH
ITS PARTICIPATING DATA CENTER TENANTS, HAS CREATED AT LEAST TEN
NEW QUALIFYING JOBS IN ADDITION TO THE JOBS THAT THE DATA CENTER
OPERATOR CREATED TO SATISFY THE REQUIREMENTS OF SECTION
24-48.5-806; AND
(c) THE CERTIFIED DATA CENTER CONTINUES TO COMPLY WITH
-28- HB26-1030

ENVIRONMENTAL REQUIREMENTS.
(2) A DATA CENTER OPERATOR OF A CERTIFIED DATA CENTER THAT
IS APPROVED FOR AN EXTENSION OF ITS CERTIFICATION BENEFITS BY THE
AUTHORITY PURSUANT TO THIS SECTION IS ELIGIBLE:
(a) FOR AN ADDITIONAL TEN YEARS OF ELIGIBILITY TO CLAIM THE
STATE SALES AND USE TAX EXEMPTION ALLOWED PURSUANT TO THIS PART
8 AND SECTION 39-26-735; AND
(b) TO MAINTAIN ITS CERTIFICATION, PROVIDED THAT THE DATA
CENTER CONTINUES TO MEET ALL APPLICABLE CERTIFICATION
REQUIREMENTS IMPOSED BY THIS PART 8.
24-48.5-811. No restriction on local government authority and
coordination.
THIS PART 8 DOES NOT LIMIT A LOCAL GOVERNMENT'S AUTHORITY
REGARDING THE REGULATION OF DATA CENTERS, INCLUDING TAXATION,
INCENTIVES, LAND USE, PERMITTING, AND NUISANCE. THIS PART 8 DOES
NOT LIMIT ANY LOCAL ENVIRONMENTAL REGULATION. IN ADDITION, THIS
PART 8 DOES NOT RESTRICT LOCAL INCENTIVES, INCLUDING UTILITY
INCENTIVES IN THE CASE OF A MUNICIPALLY OWNED UTILITY. THIS PART
8 DOES NOT REQUIRE LOCAL GOVERNMENTS TO PARTICIPATE IN THE
PROGRAM.
SECTION 2. In Colorado Revised Statutes, 24-75-402, amend
(5)(mmm) and (5)(nnn); and add (5)(ooo) as follows:
24-75-402. Cash funds - limit on uncommitted reserves -
reduction in the amount of fees - exclusions - definitions.
(5) Notwithstanding any provision of this section to the contrary,
the following cash funds are excluded from the limitations specified in
this section:
-29- HB26-1030

(mmm) The reentry services for justice-involved individuals
reinvestment cash fund created in section 25.5-4-505.7; and
(nnn) The health-related social needs reinvestment cash fund
created in section 25.5-5-340; AND
(ooo) THE DATA CENTER DEVELOPMENT AND INCENTIVE PROGRAM
CASH FUND CREATED IN SECTION 24-48.5-805 (4).
SECTION 3. In Colorado Revised Statutes, add 40-2-140 as
follows:
40-2-140. Targeted resource acquisition - emerging large-load
customers - process - funding - definitions.
(1) Definitions. AS USED IN THIS SECTION, UNLESS THE CONTEXT
OTHERWISE REQUIRES:
(a) "ADVANCED CARBON-FREE TECHNOLOGY" MEANS ELECTRIC
GENERATION TECHNOLOGY OR RESOURCES, INCLUDING LONG-DURATION
ENERGY STORAGE, THAT CAN BE TURNED ON OR OFF, OR OTHERWISE HAVE
THEIR POWER OUTPUT ADJUSTED, BASED ON DEMAND SO AS TO ENABLE
OPERATION OF A CARBON-FREE ELECTRIC SYSTEM.
(b) "EMERGING LARGE-LOAD CUSTOMER" MEANS A CUSTOMER OF
A UTILITY WITH PROJECTED LOAD REQUIREMENTS OF AT LEAST ONE
HUNDRED MEGAWATTS, EITHER INDIVIDUALLY OR IN THE AGGREGATE
THROUGH COLOCATED CUSTOMERS.
(c) "NAMEPLATE CAPACITY" MEANS THE MAXIMUM RATED OUTPUT
OF AN ELECTRIC GENERATOR, OR OTHER ELECTRIC POWER PRODUCTION
EQUIPMENT, UNDER SPECIFIC CONDITIONS DESIGNATED BY THE
MANUFACTURER.
(d) "UTILITY" MEANS A UTILITY REGULATED UNDER THE
COMMISSION'S RESOURCE PLANNING AUTHORITY.
-30- HB26-1030

(2) Eligibility for targeted resource acquisition. A UTILITY MAY
SUBMIT TO THE COMMISSION A TARGETED RESOURCE ACQUISITION
APPLICATION DESCRIBING HOW THE UTILITY INTENDS TO MEET ENERGY
AND CAPACITY NEEDS CREATED BY ONE OR MORE EMERGING LARGE-LOAD
CUSTOMERS. FOR A UTILITY TO BE ELIGIBLE TO SUBMIT A TARGETED
RESOURCE ACQUISITION APPLICATION TO THE COMMISSION, EMERGING
LARGE-LOAD CUSTOMERS OF THE UTILITY MUST:
(a) ENTER INTO A CONTRACTUAL AGREEMENT WITH THE UTILITY,
WHICH AGREEMENT INCLUDES:
(I) MINIMUM DEMAND, DURATION, AND BILLING COMMITMENTS;
OR
(II) PARTICIPATION IN ANY APPLICABLE LARGE-LOAD TARIFF
INTENDED TO BALANCE LOAD FACTOR;
(b) AGREE TO EXIT FEE PROVISIONS THAT ADDRESS EARLY
DEPARTURE OR REDUCED DEMAND, INCLUDING BUT NOT LIMITED TO A
THREE-YEAR EXIT FEE STRUCTURE TO ENSURE REVENUE STABILITY;
(c) PROVIDE APPROPRIATE CREDIT SECURITIZATION; AND
(d) DEMONSTRATE SITE CONTROL AND SUBMIT SIGNED
DEVELOPMENT AGREEMENTS TO THE UTILITY.
(3) Resource acquisition process.
(a) PRIOR TO FILING A TARGETED RESOURCE ACQUISITION
APPLICATION UNDER THIS SECTION, A UTILITY MAY ISSUE A COMPETITIVE
SOLICITATION TO IDENTIFY POTENTIAL RESOURCES TO SERVE AN
EMERGING LARGE-LOAD CUSTOMER.
(b) AS PART OF THE TARGETED RESOURCE ACQUISITION
APPLICATION, THE UTILITY MAY PROPOSE SYSTEM ASSETS FUNDED IN
WHOLE OR IN PART BY THE EMERGING LARGE-LOAD CUSTOMER. ALL SUCH
-31- HB26-1030

ASSETS MUST OPERATE AS SYSTEM ASSETS FOR THE BENEFIT OF ALL
CUSTOMERS.
(c) FOR TARGETED RESOURCE ACQUISITION APPLICATIONS
SUBMITTED ON OR BEFORE DECEMBER 31, 2039:
(I) STANDALONE RESOURCE PORTFOLIOS PROPOSED IN THE
TARGETED RESOURCE ACQUISITION APPLICATION MUST TARGET A
THREE-TO-ONE RATIO ON A NAMEPLATE CAPACITY BASIS BETWEEN
CARBON DIOXIDE NONEMITTING AND EMITTING RESOURCES.
(II) STANDALONE STORAGE DISTRIBUTED ENERGY RESOURCES
DEVELOPED FOR THE EMERGING LARGE-LOAD CUSTOMER, OR PROCURED
BY THE EMERGING LARGE-LOAD CUSTOMER VIA UTILITY PROGRAMS,
RECEIVE A TWO-TIMES MULTIPLIER BONUS ON THE NAMEPLATE CAPACITY
VALUE IN A RATIO CALCULATION. GRID-CONNECTED SOLAR DISTRIBUTED
ENERGY RESOURCES PAIRED WITH STORAGE RECEIVE A
ONE-AND-ONE-QUARTER-TIMES MULTIPLIER BONUS ON THE NAMEPLATE
CAPACITY VALUE IN A RATIO CALCULATION; EXCEPT THAT THE MULTIPLIER
BONUS ONLY APPLIES TO THE SOLAR RESOURCES IF THE STORAGE
COMPONENT OF THE HYBRID PROJECT EXCEEDS THE SOLAR PORTION.
(III) (A) IF THE STANDALONE RESOURCE PORTFOLIO, INCLUDING
ANY DISTRIBUTED ENERGY RESOURCE MULTIPLIER BONUS, DOES NOT MEET
THE THREE-TO-ONE TARGET RATIO, THE TARGETED RESOURCE
ACQUISITION APPLICATION MUST INCLUDE A PROPOSAL FOR THE EMERGING
LARGE-LOAD CUSTOMER TO FUND ADVANCED CARBON-FREE TECHNOLOGY
VIA EITHER A CLEAN TRANSITION TARIFF OR THROUGH
UTILITY-ADMINISTRATED FUNDING PROGRAMS FOR SUCH TECHNOLOGY.
(B) AS THE RATIO OF THE PROPOSED STANDALONE RESOURCE
PORTFOLIO FALLS BELOW THE THREE-TO-ONE TARGET RATIO, THE
-32- HB26-1030

PROPOSED FUNDING FROM THE EMERGING LARGE-LOAD CUSTOMER MUST
INCREASE ON A COMMENSURATE BASIS. THE INCREASED FUNDING
REQUIRED WILL BE CALCULATED USING THE DIFFERENCE BETWEEN THE
PROPOSED RATIO AND THE THREE-TO-ONE TARGET RATIO, WITH THE
EXPECTED OPERATION OF THE INCREMENTAL EMITTING GENERATION
MULTIPLIED BY A VALUE DETERMINED BY THE COMMISSION AS REQUIRED
TO SET THE AMOUNT OF FUNDING THAT NEEDS TO BE PROVIDED BY THE
EMERGING LARGE-LOAD CUSTOMER TO FUND ADVANCED CARBON-FREE
TECHNOLOGY.
(d) FOR TARGETED RESOURCE ACQUISITION APPLICATIONS
SUBMITTED ON OR AFTER JANUARY 1, 2040, ALL PROPOSED RESOURCES
MUST BE RENEWABLE AND CLEAN ENERGY RESOURCES AS DESCRIBED IN
SECTION 24-48.5-803 (12).
(e) ANY RESOURCES PROPOSED IN THE TARGETED RESOURCE
ACQUISITION APPLICATION MUST HAVE SUFFICIENT CUMULATIVE
ACCREDITED CAPACITY, AS DETERMINED BY THE UTILITY, TO MEET THE
NEEDS OF THE EMERGING LARGE-LOAD CUSTOMER WITHIN THE REQUIRED
INTERCONNECTION TIME FRAME, WHICH TIME FRAME MAY BE PHASED AS
THE LOAD SCALES.
(f) AS PART OF A TARGETED RESOURCE ACQUISITION APPLICATION,
THE UTILITY SHALL ENSURE THAT AT LEAST THIRTY PERCENT OF THE
RESOURCES AND INFRASTRUCTURE PROPOSED IN THE APPLICATION
SUPPORT CONSUMER-FACING PROGRAMS FOR SOLAR ENERGY SYSTEMS,
BATTERY ENERGY STORAGE SYSTEMS, AND LOAD REDUCTION
TECHNOLOGY.
(g) IN CONNECTION WITH A TARGETED RESOURCE ACQUISITION
APPLICATION, THE UTILITY MUST:
-33- HB26-1030

(I) USE THE REQUEST FOR PROPOSAL DOCUMENTS MOST RECENTLY
APPROVED BY THE COMMISSION, WITH CUSTOMIZATION ALLOWED TO
REFLECT THE SPECIFIC SOLICITATION AND AVOID COST SHIFTS TO OTHER
CUSTOMERS; AND
(II) BE PERMITTED TO BRING FORWARD RECENT BIDS RECEIVED
WITHIN THE PREVIOUS TWO YEARS IF THE BID PRICES REMAIN GENERALLY
CONSISTENT WITH THE PREVIOUSLY SUBMITTED TERMS.
(h) THE UTILITY MUST INCLUDE IN A TARGETED RESOURCE
ACQUISITION APPLICATION AN UPDATED EMISSIONS WORKBOOK THAT
REFLECTS:
(I) TOTAL MEGAWATT-HOURS AND ASSOCIATED EMISSIONS
ATTRIBUTABLE TO THE EMERGING LARGE-LOAD CUSTOMER; AND
(II) SEPARATE REPORTING FOR EACH DISCRETE EMERGING
LARGE-LOAD CUSTOMER IN THE CASE OF COLOCATED ARRANGEMENTS, TO
THE EXTENT PRACTICABLE.
(i) APPROVAL OF A TARGETED RESOURCE ACQUISITION
APPLICATION UNDER THIS SECTION CREATES A PRESUMPTION OF PRUDENCE
FOR ALL INFRASTRUCTURE OR RESOURCE INVESTMENTS NECESSARY TO
SERVE THE EMERGING LARGE-LOAD CUSTOMER.
(j) THE STANDARD OF REVIEW FOR THE TARGETED RESOURCE
ACQUISITION APPLICATION IS WHETHER THE PROPOSED ACQUISITION AND
ASSOCIATED INFRASTRUCTURE ARE IN THE PUBLIC INTEREST.
(k) THE UTILITY NEED NOT OBTAIN A CERTIFICATE OF PUBLIC
CONVENIENCE AND NECESSITY PURSUANT TO SECTION 40-5-102 FOR
SPECIFIC RESOURCES AND INFRASTRUCTURE IDENTIFIED IN AND APPROVED
THROUGH THE APPLICATION.
(l) THE COMMISSION SHALL ACT ON THE APPLICATION WITHIN ONE
-34- HB26-1030

HUNDRED TWENTY DAYS AFTER THE FILING OF THE APPLICATION. THE
PERIOD FOR OTHER PERSONS TO INTERVENE IN THE MATTER IS WITHIN TEN
DAYS AFTER THE FILING OF THE APPLICATION.
(4) Funding and cost recovery.
(a) A UTILITY MAY INCLUDE IN THE UTILITY'S TARGETED RESOURCE
ACQUISITION APPLICATION PRE-FUNDING COMMITMENTS FROM THE
EMERGING LARGE-LOAD CUSTOMER FOR PRE-DEVELOPMENT AND EARLY
CONSTRUCTION COSTS OF RESOURCES OR INFRASTRUCTURE, INCLUDING
TRANSMISSION AND DISTRIBUTION.
(b) THE EMERGING LARGE-LOAD CUSTOMER MAY ENTIRELY BEAR
THE COSTS ASSOCIATED WITH THE EMERGING LARGE LOAD, BUT THE
UTILITY MAY ALSO PROPOSE PARTIAL REIMBURSEMENT OF AN
APPROPRIATE PORTION OF THESE COSTS THROUGH AN EXISTING
COST-RECOVERY MECHANISM.
(c) THE UTILITY MAY RECOVER COSTS ASSOCIATED WITH
RESOURCES AND INFRASTRUCTURE DEVELOPED PURSUANT TO AN
APPROVED APPLICATION THROUGH AN ADJUSTMENT CLAUSE UNTIL
INCLUDED IN THE RATE BASE IN A FUTURE RATE CASE. THE UTILITY MAY
RECOVER TRANSMISSION COSTS THROUGH A TRANSMISSION ADJUSTMENT
CLAUSE AND DISTRIBUTION COSTS THROUGH A GRID MODERNIZATION
ADJUSTMENT CLAUSE.
(d) THE COMMISSION SHALL APPROVE THE REIMBURSEMENT
RECOVERY IF THE ACQUIRED RESOURCES OR INFRASTRUCTURE PROVIDE
SYSTEM-WIDE BENEFITS.
(5) Advanced carbon-free technology fund.
(a) A UTILITY MAY PROPOSE THE CREATION OF AN ADVANCED
CARBON-FREE TECHNOLOGY FUND, TO WHICH EMERGING LARGE-LOAD
-35- HB26-1030

CUSTOMERS MAY CONTRIBUTE VOLUNTARILY.
(b) A UTILITY MAY USE THE FUND TO:
(I) COVER PRE-DEVELOPMENT AND EARLY CONSTRUCTION COSTS
FOR SYSTEM RESOURCES AND INFRASTRUCTURE;
(II) SUPPORT UTILITY EXPLORATION OR DEPLOYMENT OF
ADVANCED CARBON-FREE TECHNOLOGY;
(III) ALLOW EMERGING LARGE-LOAD CUSTOMERS TO BENEFIT
FROM CLEAN FIRM DISPATCHABLE TECHNOLOGY LOCATED NEAR THEIR
OPERATIONS IN EXCHANGE FOR THEIR CONTRIBUTIONS; AND
(IV) MITIGATE OR ALLOCATE TECHNOLOGY PERFORMANCE RISK
ASSOCIATED WITH ADVANCED CARBON-FREE TECHNOLOGY, SUBJECT TO
THE COMMISSION'S REVIEW AND APPROVAL.
(c) IF A UTILITY IS NOT ABLE TO USE MONEY THAT IS CONTRIBUTED
TO THE FUND FOR THE PURPOSES SPECIFIED IN SUBSECTION (5)(b) OF THIS
SECTION BECAUSE AN EMERGING LARGE-LOAD PROJECT DOES NOT
MATERIALIZE, THE UTILITY MAY USE MONEY THAT IS CONTRIBUTED TO THE
FUND TO OFFSET INFRASTRUCTURE AND RESOURCE COSTS FOR THE BENEFIT
OF OTHER CUSTOMERS.
SECTION 4. In Colorado Revised Statutes, 29-2-105, amend
(1)(d)(I)(T) and (1)(d)(I)(U); and add (1)(d)(I)(V) as follows:
29-2-105. Contents of sales tax ordinances and proposals.
(1) The sales tax ordinance or proposal of any incorporated town,
city, or county adopted pursuant to this article 2 shall be imposed on the
sale of tangible personal property at retail or the furnishing of services,
as provided in subsection (1)(d) of this section. Any countywide or
incorporated town or city sales tax ordinance or proposal shall include the
following provisions:
-36- HB26-1030

(d) (I) A provision that the sale of tangible personal property and
services taxable pursuant to this article 2 is the same as the sale of
tangible personal property and services taxable pursuant to section
39-26-104, except as otherwise provided in this subsection (1)(d). The
sale of tangible personal property and services taxable pursuant to this
article 2 is subject to the same sales tax exemptions as those specified in
part 7 of article 26 of title 39; except that the sale of the following may be
exempted from a town, city, or county sales tax only by the express
inclusion of the exemption either at the time of adoption of the initial
sales tax ordinance or resolution or by amendment thereto:
(T) The exemption for sales of heat pump systems and heat pump
water heaters set forth in section 39-26-732; and
(U) The exemption for sales of energy storage systems set forth
in section 39-26-733; AND
(V) THE EXEMPTION SET FORTH IN SECTION 39-26-735 FOR SALES
OF INFORMATION TECHNOLOGY INFRASTRUCTURE AND DATA CENTER
INFRASTRUCTURE AND TRANSMISSION AND GENERATION SYSTEM ASSETS.
SECTION 5. In Colorado Revised Statutes, add 39-26-735 as
follows:
39-26-735. Certified data centers - qualified purchases -
information technology infrastructure - data center infrastructure -
tax preference performance statement - legislative declaration -
definitions.
(1) (a) IN ACCORDANCE WITH SECTION 39-21-304, WHICH
REQUIRES EACH BILL THAT CREATES A NEW TAX EXPENDITURE TO INCLUDE
A TAX PREFERENCE PERFORMANCE STATEMENT AS PART OF A STATUTORY
LEGISLATIVE DECLARATION, THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY FINDS AND
-37- HB26-1030

DECLARES THAT THE PURPOSES OF THE TAX EXPENDITURE CREATED IN
SUBSECTION (3) OF THIS SECTION ARE TO:
(I) IMPROVE INDUSTRY COMPETITIVENESS, SPECIFICALLY IN DATA
CENTER DEVELOPMENT; AND
(II) PROVIDE TAX RELIEF TO CERTAIN BUSINESSES, SPECIFICALLY
DATA CENTER OPERATORS THAT OWN OR OPERATE A CERTIFIED DATA
CENTER IN THE STATE.
(b) THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY AND THE STATE AUDITOR SHALL
MEASURE THE EFFECTIVENESS OF THE TAX EXPENDITURE IN ACHIEVING
THE PURPOSES SPECIFIED IN SUBSECTION (1)(a) OF THIS SECTION BASED ON
THE NUMBER OF CERTIFIED DATA CENTERS THAT ARE CONSTRUCTED AND
PLACED IN SERVICE IN THE STATE AND THE NUMBER AND VALUE OF THE
EXEMPTIONS CLAIMED PURSUANT TO THIS SECTION. THE AUTHORITY
SHALL PROVIDE THE STATE AUDITOR WITH ANY AVAILABLE INFORMATION
THAT WOULD ASSIST IN THE STATE AUDITOR'S ANALYSIS.
(2) AS USED IN THIS SECTION, UNLESS THE CONTEXT OTHERWISE
REQUIRES:
(a) "CERTIFIED DATA CENTER" MEANS A DATA CENTER THAT HAS
OBTAINED CERTIFICATION FROM THE AUTHORITY PURSUANT TO PART 8 OF
ARTICLE 48.5 OF TITLE 24.
(b) "COLORADO DATA CENTER DEVELOPMENT AUTHORITY" OR
"AUTHORITY" MEANS THE COLORADO DATA CENTER DEVELOPMENT
AUTHORITY CREATED IN SECTION 24-48.5-804.
(c) "QUALIFIED DATA CENTER INFRASTRUCTURE AND SYSTEMS"
MEANS INFORMATION TECHNOLOGY INFRASTRUCTURE AND DATA CENTER
INFRASTRUCTURE AND TRANSMISSION AND GENERATION SYSTEM ASSETS,
AS DESCRIBED IN SECTION 24-48.5-803 (11).
-38- HB26-1030

(d) "STATE SALES AND USE TAX EXEMPTION CERTIFICATE" MEANS
A STATE SALES AND USE TAX EXEMPTION CERTIFICATE ISSUED BY THE
AUTHORITY TO A CERTIFIED DATA CENTER PURSUANT TO PART 8 OF
ARTICLE 48.5 OF TITLE 24.
(3) BEGINNING JANUARY 1, 2027, ALL SALES AND USE OF
QUALIFIED DATA CENTER INFRASTRUCTURE AND SYSTEMS THAT WILL BE
PURCHASED AND USED IN CONNECTION WITH A CERTIFIED DATA CENTER
FOR WHICH A DATA CENTER OPERATOR HAS A STATE SALES AND USE TAX
EXEMPTION CERTIFICATE IS EXEMPT FROM TAXATION UNDER PARTS 1 AND
2 OF THIS ARTICLE 26.
(4) NOTWITHSTANDING SECTION 39-21-304 (4), THE EXEMPTION
ALLOWED PURSUANT TO THIS SECTION CONTINUES INDEFINITELY.
SECTION 6. Applicability. This act applies to data centers for
which the building or the purchase of equipment or regulated resource
acquisitions commence on or after the effective date of this act.
SECTION 7. Safety clause. The general assembly finds,
determines, and declares that this act is necessary for the immediate
preservation of the public peace, health, or safety or for appropriations for
the support and maintenance of the departments of the state and state
institutions.
-39- HB26-1030